Utah statutes.
31A-8-406.   Distribution by nonprofit organizations.
A nonprofit organization may pay compensation in a reasonable amount to its
members, trustees, or officers for services rendered, may make reasonable
incentive payments to its providers, may confer benefits upon its members in
conformity with its purposes, may pay interest on certificates of indebtedness
issued by it evidencing capital contributions, and upon dissolution or final
liquidation may make distributions to its members as permitted by Title 16,
Chapter 6a, Utah Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act, and no such payment,
benefit, or distribution shall be considered to be a dividend or distribution
of income. Notwithstanding Section 31A-8-105, and in addition to the powers
granted in that section, a nonprofit organization has all powers conferred
upon it by Section 16-6a-302.
